Hawaii statutes.
§431:7-311 Not subject to levy. No
judgment creditor or other claimant of an insurer shall levy upon any deposit
held pursuant to this article or upon any part hereof. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next